Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 1

Financial Disclosure

2-10-101. Short title — Application — Administration — Adoption of more stringent requirements.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Campaign Financial Disclosure Act of 1980.”

This part does not apply to any candidate for public office for which the service is part time and for which the compensation is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per month; provided, that this exemption shall not be applicable to any such candidate for a public office as a chief administrative officer or to any such candidate whose expenditures exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Any charter provisions of municipalities regarding campaign financial disclosures of candidates for public office apply to candidates for public office, except to the extent that such provisions are in conflict with this part.

The registry of election finance shall have the jurisdiction to administer and enforce the provisions of this part concerning campaign financial disclosure.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as prohibiting the largest municipality located within any county having a population of not less than three hundred thirty-five thousand (335,000) nor more than three hundred thirty-six thousand (336,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, from enacting, by ordinance or charter amendment, more stringent financial disclosures of candidates for municipal local public office than those requirements imposed by this part. A municipality adopting more stringent requirements pursuant to this chapter shall compensate the county for any additional expenses incurred by the county election commission as a result of adopting more stringent requirements.

Acts 1980, ch. 861, § 2; 1982, ch. 689, § 11; 1984, ch. 683, §§ 1, 7; 1989, ch. 585, § 9; 1997, ch. 558, § 23; 2000, ch. 782, § 1; 2013, ch. 231, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Disclosure statements of conflict of interests, title 8, ch. 50, part 5.

Lobbyist registration and disclosure, title 3, ch. 6.

Registry of election finance, title 2, ch. 10, part 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney General, § 4; 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 24.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Bemis Pentecostal Church v. State: The Validity of Tennessee's Campaign Disclosure Act, 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 324 (1989).

First Amendment and “Foreign-Controlled” U.S. Corporations: Why Congress Ought to Affirm Domestic Subsidiaries’ Corporate Political-Speech Rights (Scott L. Friedman), 46 Vand. J. Transnat’l L. 613 (2013).

Mistaken Identity: Unveiling the Property Characteristics of Political Money, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 1235 (2000).

Professional Responsibilities of Lobbyists (William R. Bruce), 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 547 (1993).

Attorney General Opinions. Anonymous campaign contributions, OAG 97-065 (5/12/97).

Candidate's acceptance of contributions for primary election that may not occur, OAG 97-137 (10/06/97).

Surplus campaign funds of deceased candidate for state or local office, OAG 99-118 (5/14/99).

Neither the Campaign Financial Disclosure Act or the Campaign Contribution Limits Act contains any time limitation on when a multicandidate political campaign committee must support or oppose a second candidate or measure, OAG 03-112 (9/9/03).

2-10-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Affiliated political campaign committees” means political campaign committees established, financed, maintained, or controlled by any corporation, labor organization, or any other person, including any parent, subsidiary, branch, division, department, or local unit of such corporation, labor organization, or any other person, or by any group of such persons;

All committees established, financed, maintained or controlled by a single corporation and/or its subsidiaries shall be affiliated political campaign committees;

All committees established, financed, maintained or controlled by a single national or international union and/or its local unions or other subordinate organizations shall be affiliated political campaign committees;

All committees established, financed, maintained or controlled by an organization of national or international unions and/or all its state and the local central bodies shall be affiliated political campaign committees, but such committees shall not be affiliated with the political campaign committees established, financed, maintained or controlled by any union that is a member of the organization;

All committees established, financed, maintained or controlled by a membership organization, other than political party committees, including trade or professional associations and/or related state and local entities of that organization or group shall be affiliated political campaign committees;

All committees established, financed, maintained or controlled by the same person or group of persons shall be affiliated political campaign committees;

Owners, officers, employees, members or other individuals associated with any corporation, labor organization, membership organization, or any other person or group of persons that has established, financed, maintained or controlled a political campaign committee shall not be considered affiliated with such political campaign committee;

“Attorney general and reporter” means the attorney general and reporter of Tennessee;

“Candidate” means an individual who has made a formal announcement of candidacy or who is qualified under the law of this state to seek nomination for election or elections to public office, or has received contributions or made expenditures except for incidental expenditures to determine if one shall be a candidate, or has given consent for a campaign committee to receive contributions or make expenditures with a view to bringing about the individual's nomination for election or election to state public office;

“Contribution” means any advance, conveyance, deposit, distribution, transfer of funds, loan, loan guaranty, personal funds of a candidate, payment, digital currency, gift, or subscription of money or like thing of value, and any contract, agreement, promise or other obligation, whether or not legally enforceable, made for the purpose of influencing a measure or nomination for election or the election of any person for public office or for the purpose of defraying any expenses of an officeholder incurred in connection with the performance of the officeholder's duties, responsibilities, or constituent services. “Contribution” shall not be construed to include the following:

Services, including expenses provided without compensation by a candidate or individuals volunteering a portion or all of their time, on behalf of a candidate or campaign committee;

Any news story, commentary or editorial distributed through the facilities of any broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine or other periodical publication, unless such facilities are owned wholly or in part, or controlled by any political party, political committee or candidate;

Nonpartisan activity designed to encourage individuals to register to vote or to vote;

Any written, oral or electronically transmitted communication by any membership organization or corporation to its members or stockholders, if such membership organization or corporation is not organized primarily for the purpose of influencing the nomination for election, or election, of any person to public office;

The use of real or personal property and the cost of invitations, food and beverages not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100), voluntarily provided on an individual's residential premises for candidate related activities; or

For a county executive committee that has annual receipts and expenditures of less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), receipts and expenditures, including a reasonable amount for rent, by a state or county executive committee or primary board when performing the duties imposed upon them by law; provided, that such receipts and expenditures are segregated from and maintained in a fund separate and apart from any funds used by the party as a political campaign committee, it being the legislative intent that if no separate fund is maintained, all receipts and expenditures of the committee or board shall be subject to the disclosure provisions of this part;

“Election” means any general, special or primary election or run-off election, held to approve or disapprove a measure or nominate or elect a candidate for public office;

“Expenditure” means a purchase, payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit or gift of money or anything of value made for the purpose of influencing a measure or the nomination for election or election of any person to public office;

“Expenditure” also includes the use of campaign funds by an officeholder for the furtherance of the office of the officeholder;

“File” or “filed” means the date actually deposited with or received by the appropriate office or the date of the postmark if postmarked and sent by registered or certified mail of the United States postal service;

“Measure” means any proposal submitted to the people of the entire state, or any political subdivision of the state, for their approval or rejection at an election, including any proposed law, act or part of an act of the general assembly, or revision of or amendment to the constitution;

“Multicandidate political campaign committee” means a political campaign committee to support or oppose two (2) or more candidates for public office or two (2) or more measures;

“Person” means an individual, partnership, committee, association, corporation, labor organization or any other organization or group of persons;

Any limited liability company or limited liability partnership created under title 48 shall be considered a person for the purpose of this subdivision (10) and subdivision (1);

“Personal funds” means:

Any assets which the candidate had legal right of access to or control over at the time the candidate became a candidate and with respect to which the candidate had either:

Legal and rightful title; or

An equitable interest;

Salary and other earned income from bona fide employment;

Dividends and proceeds from the sale of the candidate's stocks or other investments;

Bequests to the candidate; income from trusts established before candidacy;

Income from trusts established by bequest after candidacy of which the candidate is the beneficiary;

Gifts of a personal nature which had been customarily received prior to candidacy; and

That portion of assets jointly owned with the candidate's spouse which is the candidate's share under the instruments of conveyance or ownership. If no specific share is indicated by such instrument, the value of one-half of the property used shall be considered as personal funds;

“Political campaign committee” means:

Any corporation or any other organization making expenditures, except as provided in subdivision (4), to support or oppose a measure; or

Any committee, club, corporation, association, or other group of persons which receives contributions or makes expenditures to support or oppose any candidate for public office or measure during a calendar year in an aggregate amount exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000);

“Public office” means any state public office or local public office filled by the voters;

“Local public office” means any state, county, municipal, school or other district or precinct office or position, including general sessions and juvenile court judges, that is filled by the voters, with the exception that “local public office” does not include any state public office as defined in subdivision (13)(B); and

“State public office” means the offices of governor, member of the general assembly, delegate to a Tennessee constitutional convention, trial judge, chancellor, district attorney general, district public defender, judge of the court of criminal appeals, judge of the court of appeals and supreme court judge; and

“Secretary of state” means the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee.

Acts 1980, ch. 861, § 3; 1982, ch. 658, §§ 1-3; 1984, ch. 683, §§ 5, 7; 1990, ch. 1048, §§ 1-3; 1991, ch. 519, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 988, § 8; 1995, ch. 305, § 59; 1995, ch. 531, §§ 2, 3; 1996, ch. 1005, § 1; 2000, ch. 756, § 12; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 5; 2011, ch. 389, § 1; 2012, ch. 789, §§ 1, 2; 2015, ch. 379, § 1; 2017, ch. 347, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added “digital currency,” in (4).

The 2017 amendment, in the definition of “political campaign committee”, deleted former (A) which read: “(A) A combination of two (2) or more individuals, including any political party governing body, whether state or local, making expenditures, to support or oppose any candidate for public office or measure, but does not include a voter registration program;”; redesignated former (B) and (C) as present (A) and (B); and substituted “during a calendar year in an aggregate amount exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000)” for “during a calendar quarter in an aggregate amount exceeeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250)” at the end of present (B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 379, § 3. April 30, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 347, § 2. May 9, 2017.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 567.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 24.

Law Reviews.

Curtailing the Cudgel of “Coordination” by Curing Confusion: How States Can Fix What the Feds Got Wrong on Campaign Finance, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 463 (2017).

Attorney General Opinions. Application of campaign contribution limits to donations to constituent service accounts, OAG 95-098 (9/1/95).

Constituent services account, OAG 96-009 (1/24/96).

Independent election expenditures, OAG 96-90 (7/24/96).

Application of campaign finance laws to contributions to officeholder's legal defense fund, OAG 97-146 (10/23/97).

Contribution of candidate's personal funds during legislative session, OAG 98-061 (3/9/98), OAG 98-062 (3/9/98).

Calculation of annual receipts and expenditures of county executive committee, OAG 98-0121 (7/10/98).

Applicability of exemption from definition of “contribution” under subdivision (3)(F), OAG 98-0121 (7/10/98).

Disclosure of receipts by state political parties with multicandidate campaign committees, OAG 98-0121 (7/10/98).

Attribution and disclosure of post-election contribution to successful debt-free candidate, OAG 98-0122 (7/10/98).

Application of campaign finance legislation to limited liability companies, OAG 99-086 (4/8/99).

Surplus campaign funds of deceased candidate for state or local office, OAG 99-118 (5/14/99).

An organization may be a multicandidate political campaign committee, even if it has only received one contribution, OAG 03-112 (9/9/03).

A proposition on the ballot directing the recall of an elected official would qualify as a “measure” within the meaning of subdivision (5) of this section; thus a political campaign committee for a local election to approve or disapprove a measure is required to file a report of all contributions received and all expenditures made by or on behalf of the committee, OAG 04-135 (8/23/04).

Filing of disclosure statements by corporations for independent expenditures. OAG 10-39, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 39 (3/30/10).

Corporate contributions to political action committees under Acts 2010, ch. 1095.OAG 11-7, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (1/12/11).

Application of campaign finance laws to limited liability companies. OAG 11-83, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 85 (12/29/11).

State law does not prohibit elected state officials from using state property, including the Executive Residence, for campaign-related activities. Tennessee’s Campaign Financial Disclosure Act would require the disclosure of expenditures incurred for such campaign-related activities on state property if they constitute either a “contribution” or an “expenditure” as defined under the Act. To the extent that the Governor’s non-personal schedule, including events at the Executive Residence, meets the definition of “public record” as set forth in T.C.A. § 10-7503(a)(1)(A), then it is subject to disclosure under Tennessee’s Public Records Act, unless a state law provides otherwise. OAG 16-48, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (12/22/2016).

2-10-103. Duties of county election commissions.

It is the duty of each county election commission to:

Accept and file any information filed pursuant to the requirements of this part and information voluntarily supplied that exceeds the requirements of this part;

Make statements and other information filed with it available for public inspection and copying during regular office hours at reasonable expense;

Preserve such statements and other information for a period of five (5) years from date of receipt; and

Notify all candidates for local public office in a local election of the requirements for filing any statement required by this part seven (7) days before any deadline provided for herein.

It is the duty of the state election commission to furnish the name and address of any candidate for statewide public office and the language of any measure submitted to the people of the entire state to the secretary of state and the registry of election finance.

Acts 1980, ch. 861, § 4; 1984, ch. 683, §§ 2, 7; 1989, ch. 585, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Former subsection (d) of this section was transferred in 1985 to §2-10-109(a)(1).

2-10-104. Affirmation of statements before witness.

All statements required by this part shall be signed by the person filing such statement in the presence of one (1) witness who shall sign such statements as a witness. The treasurer shall not be authorized to sign as a witness. Such person shall sign the statements prior to the filing of the statements. Statements required by this part do not have to be sworn to or affirmed by a notary.

Acts 1980, ch. 861, § 5; 2004, ch. 594, § 1.

Cross-References. Notaries public, §8-16-101 et seq.

Attorney General Opinions. Administration of oaths, OAG 94-80 (7/11/94).

2-10-105. Filing of contribution, loan and expenditure statements — Deadlines — Certification of treasurers and other officers — Retention of records — Additional reporting requirements.

Each candidate for state public office and political campaign committee in a state election shall file with the registry of election finance a statement of all contributions received and all expenditures made by or on behalf of such candidate or such committee. The statement of each candidate for state public office shall include the date of the receipt of each contribution, and the statement of a political campaign committee in a state election shall include the date of each expenditure that is a contribution to a candidate in any election.

Each candidate for local public office and political campaign committee for a local election shall file with each county election commission of the county where the election is held a statement of all contributions received and all expenditures made by or on behalf of such candidate or such committee. The statement of each candidate for local public office shall include the date of the receipt of each contribution, and the statement of a political campaign committee for a local election shall include the date of each expenditure that is a contribution to a candidate in any election.

The statements required by subsections (a) and (b) of each candidate, each single candidate political campaign committee, single measure political campaign or multicandidate political campaign committee shall be filed quarterly during an election year, within ten (10) days following the conclusion of the quarterly reports ending March 31, June 30, September 30 and January 15. Such candidate and political campaign committees shall also be required to file a pre-primary statement and pre-general election statement. The pre-primary statement shall cover the period from the last day included in the July quarterly statement through the tenth day before the primary election. Such pre-primary statement is due seven (7) days before the primary election. The pre-general election statement shall cover the period from the last day included in the October quarterly statement through the tenth day before the general election. Such pre-general election statement is due seven (7) days before the general election.

Statements for any runoff election, from the last day included in any prior report through the tenth day before any such election shall be filed not later than seven (7) days before the election.

Any candidate or political campaign committee filing a statement pursuant to subsection (e) before January 16 of the year in which the candidate or committee expects to be involved in an election shall file reports with the registry of election finance or the county election commission, whichever is required by subsections (a) and (b), by January 31 and July 15 immediately succeeding the filing, and semi-annually thereafter until the year of the election. If January 31 or July 15 falls on a Saturday, a Sunday, or a legal holiday, § 1-3-102 shall apply. The ending date of the January 31 reporting period is January 15. The ending date of the July 15 reporting period is June 30. A semiannual report is not required to be made if the reporting date is within sixty (60) days of a report otherwise required by this part.

Each statement required by subsections (a) and (b) shall include transactions occurring since the preceding statement.

Each multicandidate political campaign committee shall file reports according to subsection (c)(1). Each report shall include transactions occurring since the preceding report. Such reports shall be made available on the Internet as soon as practicable once such multicandidate political campaign committee has filed such information and the registry has reviewed such statements for accuracy and timeliness. If a multicandidate political campaign committee has not timely filed a quarterly report, then the registry shall post on the Internet that the multicandidate political campaign committee is delinquent.

Each candidate and each political campaign committee shall certify the name and address of the candidate's or committee's political treasurer to the registry of election finance or the county election commission, where appropriate, before the candidate or committee may receive a contribution or make an expenditure in a state or local election. A statement certifying a candidate's treasurer must contain the office the candidate is seeking and the year of the election. A state public officeholder shall also certify the name and address of such officeholder's political treasurer to the registry of election finance before the officeholder or the officeholder's political committee may accept a contribution to defray the expenses incurred in connection with the performance of the officeholder's duties or responsibilities, and a local officeholder shall so certify the name and address of such officeholder's treasurer to the appropriate county election commission. A candidate may serve as that candidate's own political treasurer. A candidate or political campaign committee shall notify the registry of election finance or county election commission of any changes in the office of its political treasurer. Any such statements filed pursuant to this part shall be cosigned by the candidate, if such candidate appoints a political treasurer other than the candidate.

In addition to the requirements in subdivision (e)(1), a multicandidate political campaign committee shall also certify the name and address of all officers of such committee to the registry of election finance. A multicandidate political campaign committee is required to have at least one (1) officer, not including the treasurer of such committee.

All records used by the candidate or political campaign committee to complete a statement required by this part shall be retained by the candidate or political campaign committee for at least two (2) years after the date of the election to which the records refer or the date of the statement, whichever is later. After the two-year period, the candidate or political campaign committee is authorized to destroy such records, absent any pending investigation by the registry of election finance or any other law enforcement agency, or absent any administrative or court proceeding. Once an investigation is closed by the registry of election finance, records may be destroyed upon a petition for approval to the registry of election finance.

Separate reporting shall be required for both primary elections and general elections. Cumulative reporting for both primary and general elections for the same office in the same year is expressly prohibited. An appointment of a political treasurer pursuant to subsection (e) may be cumulative, and one (1) such appointment shall be sufficient for both a primary and general election for the same office in the same year. A successful primary candidate shall not be required to certify a political treasurer for the general election, if the candidate had previously certified such political treasurer prior to the primary election.

During the period beginning at twelve o'clock (12:00) midnight of the tenth day prior to a primary, general, runoff or special election or a referendum and extending through twelve o'clock (12:00) midnight of such election or referendum day, each candidate or political campaign committee shall, by telegram, facsimile machine, hand delivery or overnight mail delivery, file a report with the registry of election finance or the county election commission, whichever is required by subsections (a) and (b), of:

The full name and address of each person from whom the candidate or committee has received and accepted a contribution, loan or transfer of funds during such period and the date of the receipt of each contribution in excess of the following amounts: a committee participating in the election of a candidate for any state public office, five thousand dollars ($5,000); or, a committee participating in the election of a candidate for any local public office, two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). If the committee is participating in the election of candidates for offices with different reporting amounts, the amount shall be the lowest for any candidate in whose election the committee is participating or in which any committee is participating to which it makes or from which it receives a transfer of funds; and

Such report shall include the amount and date of each such contribution or loan reported, and a brief description and valuation of each in-kind contribution. If a loan is reported, the report shall contain the name and address of the lender, of the recipient of the proceeds of the loan, and of any person who makes any type of security agreement binding such person or such person's property, directly or indirectly, for the repayment of all or any part of the loan.

Each report required by subdivision (h)(1) shall be filed by the end of the next business day following the day on which the contribution to be reported is received.

The registry shall develop appropriate forms for the report required by subdivision (h)(1) and make such forms available to the candidates and the county election commissions.

Any state or local political party or caucus of such political party established by members of either house of the general assembly that controls or operates one (1) or more political campaign committees shall report all receipts and disbursements by the party in the same manner and at the same time that it reports contributions and expenditures by the party's political campaign committee.

Reports filed under this section shall not be cumulative, except as provided in subsection (g) regarding appointment of a political treasurer. Each report shall reflect the total for its own reporting period.

“Date of the receipt”, as used in this section, means the date when the contribution was received by the candidate, candidate's committee, or treasurer.

Acts 1980, ch. 861, § 6; 1981, ch. 136, § 1; 1984, ch. 683, §§ 3, 7; 1989, ch. 585, §§ 11-13; 1990, ch. 1078, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 519, §§ 3, 4; 1995, ch. 531, §§ 9, 11-13; 1996, ch. 1005, § 2; 1997, ch. 410, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 650, §§ 1-3; 2000, ch. 925, § 1; 2004, ch. 915, § 2; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 2; 2010, ch. 685, § 1; 2012, ch. 693, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 915, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Public Accountability and Disclosure Act of 2004”.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney General, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Curtailing the Cudgel of “Coordination” by Curing Confusion: How States Can Fix What the Feds Got Wrong on Campaign Finance, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 463 (2017).

Attorney General Opinions. Independent election expenditures, OAG 96-90 (7/24/96).

Disclosure of receipts by state political parties with multicandidate campaign committees, OAG 98-0121 (7/10/98).

Requirement of new certification of political treasurer, OAG 98-0122 (7/10/98).

Attribution and disclosure of post-election contribution to successful debt-free candidate, OAG 98-0122 (7/10/98).

Application of campaign finance legislation to limited liability companies, OAG 99-086 (4/8/99).

A group or organization becomes a multicandidate political campaign committee when it appoints or certifies a political treasurer to the Registry of Election Finance pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, OAG 03-112 (9/9/03).

Filing of disclosure statements by corporations for independent expenditures. OAG 10-39, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 39 (3/30/10).

Application of campaign finance laws to limited liability companies. OAG 11-83, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 85 (12/29/11).

State law does not prohibit elected state officials from using state property, including the Executive Residence, for campaign-related activities. Tennessee’s Campaign Financial Disclosure Act would require the disclosure of expenditures incurred for such campaign-related activities on state property if they constitute either a “contribution” or an “expenditure” as defined under the Act. To the extent that the Governor’s non-personal schedule, including events at the Executive Residence, meets the definition of “public record” as set forth in T.C.A. § 10-7503(a)(1)(A), then it is subject to disclosure under Tennessee’s Public Records Act, unless a state law provides otherwise. OAG 16-48, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (12/22/2016).

The disclaimer requirements of T.C.A. §2-19-120 apply when a person finances an election-related communication on a social media platform. T.C.A.. §2-10-105 is also applicable to political communications on social media platforms. OAG 18-37, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 36 (8/14/2018).

2-10-106. Supplemental semiannual statements of contributions and expenditures — Funds maintained in segregated campaign accounts.

If the final statement of a candidate shows an unexpended balance of contributions, continuing debts and obligations, or an expenditure deficit, the campaign treasurer shall file with the registry of election finance or the county election commission, whichever is required by § 2-10-105(a) and (b), a supplemental semiannual statement of contributions and expenditures. Beginning after filing the first quarterly report due after an election, subsequent supplemental statements shall be filed on a semiannual basis by candidates until the account shows no unexpended balance, continuing debts and obligations, expenditures, or deficit. A candidate may close out a campaign account by transferring any remaining funds to any campaign fund, subject to the requirements of this part and commence semiannual filing as provided by this part.

Funds maintained in a separate segregated campaign account are not deemed to be the personal property of any candidate or other individual. Such funds are not subject to garnishment or any type of execution to satisfy the debts or obligations of any individual which are not campaign debts.

Acts 1980, ch. 861, § 7; 1984, ch. 683, §§ 7, 8; 1989, ch. 585, § 14; 1992, ch. 932, § 4; 1992, ch. 978, § 7; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney General, § 4.

Attorney General Opinions. Attribution and disclosure of post-election contribution to successful debt-free candidate, OAG 98-0122 (7/10/98).

Surplus campaign funds of deceased candidate for state or local office, OAG 99-118 (5/14/99).

Candidate cannot transfer a negative balance from one campaign account and start a subsequent election account with a negative balance, OAG 03-089 (7/15/03).

Filing of disclosure statements by corporations for independent expenditures. OAG 10-39, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 39 (3/30/10).